Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
State Theatre of Kentucky

153.110.
State theatre of Kentucky — Activities — Accreditation of college credits.

Actors Theatre of Louisville is hereby designated and declared to be the state theatre of Kentucky. The state theatre, so designated and declared, may be engaged to present public plays and performances at any and all of the state parks throughout the Commonwealth, may create and present public plays and performances throughout the Commonwealth and may meet with regional groups to help develop ideas in drama, pageants and centennials, help in tourist promotion, create a playwrights’ center and art colony, and offer accreditation of college credits through the state colleges and universities.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 148, § 1; 1974, ch. 380, § 1.

153.120.
Tuition — Admission — Performances in state parks — Expenditures.

The state theatre may charge tuition for attending the school of drama and may charge the public admission for attending the plays and performances, and this shall be the primary income of the state theatre.

The commissioner of parks is authorized to enter into such contracts and make such guarantees to the state theatre for the presentment of their plays in state parks as shall be approved by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The income so received shall be used by the state theatre to meet the cost of expenses of the productions and the operation of the school, the depreciation or replacement of equipment, and reasonable compensation to the officers and employees of the state theatre.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 148, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).

153.130.
Gifts and scholarships.

The commissioner of parks is authorized to accept gifts, donations, bequests and scholarships for the use and benefit of the state theatre.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 148, § 3.

153.140.
Powers of state theatre.

Nothing in KRS 153.110 to 153.140 shall be construed as prohibiting the state theatre from:

Receiving gifts, donations, bequests and scholarships directly from a benefactor;

Receiving a direct appropriation from the General Assembly; or

Presenting public plays and performances at places other than the various state parks.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 148, § 4.

153.180.
Kentucky Foundation for the Arts — Purpose — Funding — Board of trustees — Support staff — Annual report.

There is hereby established a nonprofit foundation to be known as the Kentucky Foundation for the Arts. The purpose of the foundation shall be to enhance the stability of Kentucky’s arts organizations and to ensure Kentuckians have access to the arts through the support of an endowment fund.

Funding for the foundation shall be obtained through state appropriations, gifts, grants, and any other funds from the public and private sectors. The foundation board shall have the authority to solicit, accept, and receive contributions from the public and private sectors to match public funding. Moneys in the foundation fund shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year. Moneys in the foundation fund shall be invested by the Office of Financial Management established in KRS 42.0201 consistent with the provisions of KRS Chapter 42, and interest income earned shall be credited to the foundation fund. The foundation board may use the investment income for the purpose of awarding matching grants to nonprofit arts organizations to carry out the following programs:

The Performing Arts and Visual Arts Touring Subsidy Program shall support tours and exhibitions for the education and enjoyment of audiences throughout the state; and

The Institutional Stabilization Program shall provide operating funds to achieve short-term or long-term stability of arts organizations.

The foundation shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of six (6) members appointed by the Governor on recommendations from the Kentucky Arts Council. For the initial appointments, the Governor shall appoint two (2) members to serve two (2) year terms; two (2) members to serve three (3) year terms; and two (2) members to serve four (4) year terms. Thereafter, the Governor shall make all appointments for a term of four (4) years. The board shall elect by majority vote a chair and other officers deemed necessary. Board members shall not receive any compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed in accordance with the provisions of KRS 49.040 and 45.101 for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The foundation board shall perform duties and responsibilities deemed necessary to fulfill the purposes of this section. The foundation board shall establish by administrative regulation procedures for administration of the foundation, eligibility criteria for the award of grants, appropriate matching contributions from grant recipients, and evaluation and reporting requirements.

The foundation shall be attached to the Office of the Secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes only. The Kentucky Arts Council shall provide to the foundation by agreement staff support and office facilities for which reasonable charges and fees may be levied against the foundation fund.

The foundation board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission listing the sources of funds acquired and expended.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 588, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 46, § 25, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 568, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 29, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 33, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 74, § 90, effective June 29, 2017.